src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-skuul_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - škuuʹl a-stem koulu: # Noun - full paradigm
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Nom: škuuʹl
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Gen: škuuʹl
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Acc: škuuʹl
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Ill: [škooula, škõõula]
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Loc: škuuʹlest
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Com: škuuʹlin
     škuuʹl+N+Ess: škuuʹlen
     škuuʹl+N+Par: škuuʹled
     škuuʹl+N+Sg+Abe: [škuuʹltaa, škuuʹltää]
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Nom: škuuʹl
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Gen: škuuʹli
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Acc: škuuʹlid
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Ill: škuuʹlid
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Loc: škuuʹlin
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Com: škuuʹlivuiʹm
     škuuʹl+N+Pl+Abe: [škuuʹlitaa, škuuʹlitää]
